Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF496.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1926YH (6) 91 jm/jh H.F. 496 Section 1. Section 422.5, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. A tax is imposed upon every resident and nonresident 3 of the state which tax shall be levied, collected, and paid 4 annually upon and with respect to the entire taxable income as 5 defined in this subchapter at a rate of three and eight-tenths 6 two and one-half percent. 7 Sec. 2. Section 422.5, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 2025, 8 is amended to read as follows: 9 b. In lieu of the computation in subsection 1 , or in 10 paragraph âaâ of this subsection , if the married personsâ 11 filing jointly, head of householdâs, or surviving spouseâs 12 net income exceeds thirteen thousand five hundred dollars, 13 the regular tax imposed under this subchapter shall be the 14 lesser of the alternate state individual income tax rate of 15 four and three-tenths three percent times the portion of the 16 net income in excess of thirteen thousand five hundred dollars 17 or the regular tax liability computed without regard to this 18 sentence. Taxpayers electing to file separately shall compute 19 the alternate tax described in this paragraph using the total 20 net income of the spouses. The alternate tax described in this 21 paragraph does not apply if one spouse elects to carry back 22 or carry forward a net operating loss as provided under the 23 Internal Revenue Code or in section 422.9 . 24 Sec. 3. Section 422.5, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 2025, 25 is amended to read as follows: 26 b. In lieu of the computation in subsection 1 or 2 , if 27 the married personsâ filing jointly, head of householdâs, or 28 surviving spouseâs net income exceeds thirty-two thousand 29 dollars, the regular tax imposed under this subchapter shall 30 be the lesser of the alternate state individual income tax 31 rate of four and three-tenths three percent times the portion 32 of the net income in excess of thirty-two thousand dollars 33 or the regular tax liability computed without regard to this 34 sentence. Taxpayers electing to file separately shall compute 35 -1- LSB 1926YH (6) 91 jm/jh 1/ 2 H.F. 496 the alternate tax described in this paragraph using the total 1 net income of the spouses. The alternate tax described in this 2 paragraph does not apply if one spouse elects to carry back 3 or carry forward a net operating loss as provided under the 4 Internal Revenue Code or in section 422.9 . 5 Sec. 4. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to tax years 6 beginning on or after January 1, 2026. 7